test/src/gt-norm-yamls/noun-even_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Evensyllable nouns belonging to GOAHTI-A, GOAHTI-I, GOAHTI-U, GOAHTI, PROFIILA, GOAHTILONG, GOAHTILONGSHORT, ALBMI, ALBMILONG, ALBMILONGSHORT, BEALLE, AIGI, BASSI, EADNI, VALDI, RAFI, STAHTA, IIJA, STRUKTUR, KULTUR, MAŠIIDNA, BENSIN, GADDI, GADDISHORT, LUONDU, RUOKTU, MANNI,  ADRENALIN, TELEFON, SOSIAL, GARGIA, BUFFALO, ESSAYA, JOHTOLAT, UPMI, EAPMI, BUVSSAT

Tests:
  Noun - bietna: # GOAHTI-A
    bietna+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: bietna-
    bietna+N+Sg+Nom: bietna
    bietna+N+Sg+Gen: biena
    bietna+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: bietname
    bietna+N+Sg+Acc: biena
    bietna+N+Sg+Ill: bitnii
    bietna+N+Sg+Loc: bienas
    bietna+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: bienastan
    bietna+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: bienastat
    bietna+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: bienainan
    bietna+N+Pl+Acc: bienaid
    bietna+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: bienaidasat
    bietna+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: bienaideameguin
    bietna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bienaš
    bietna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: bienažis
    bietna+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: bienalažžan
    bietna+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: bienaheapme


  Noun - beaivi: # GOAHTI-I
    beaivi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: [beaive-]
    beaivi+N+Sg+Nom: beaivi
    beaivi+N+Sg+Gen: [beaivvi, beaivve]
    beaivi+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: beaiváme
    beaivi+N+Sg+Acc: beaivvi
    beaivi+N+Sg+Ill: beaivái
    beaivi+N+Sg+Loc: beaivvis
    beaivi+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: beaivvistan
    beaivi+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: beaivvistat
    beaivi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: beivviinan
    beaivi+N+Pl+Acc: beivviid
    beaivi+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: beivviidasat
    beaivi+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: beivviideameguin
    beaivi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: beaivváš
    beaivi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: beaivvážis
    beaivi+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: beaivválažžan
    beaivi+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [beaivveheapme, beaivviheapme]


  Noun - joavku: # GOAHTI-U
    joavku+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: [joavko-]
    joavku+N+Sg+Nom: joavku
    joavku+N+Sg+Gen: [joavkku, joavkko]
    joavku+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: jovkome
    joavku+N+Sg+Acc: joavkku
    joavku+N+Sg+Ill: jovkui
    joavku+N+Sg+Loc: joavkkus
    joavku+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: joavkkustan
    joavku+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: joavkkustat
    joavku+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: joavkkuinan
    joavku+N+Ess: joavkun
    joavku+N+Pl+Nom: joavkkut
    joavku+N+Pl+Gen: joavkkuid
    joavku+N+Pl+Acc: joavkkuid
    joavku+N+Pl+Ill: joavkkuide
    joavku+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: joavkkuidasat
    joavku+N+Pl+Loc: joavkkuin
    joavku+N+Pl+Com: joavkkuiguin
    joavku+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: joavkkuideameguin
    joavku+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: jovkkoš
    joavku+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: jovkkožis
    joavku+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: jovkkolažžan
    joavku+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [joavkkuheapme, joavkkoheapme]


  Noun - stensiila: # PROFIILA
    stensiila+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: stensiila-
    stensiila+N+Sg+Nom: stensiila
    stensiila+N+Sg+Gen: stensiilla
    stensiila+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: stensiilame
    stensiila+N+Sg+Acc: stensiilla
    stensiila+N+Sg+Ill: stensiilii
    stensiila+N+Sg+Loc: stensiillas
    stensiila+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: stensiillastan
    stensiila+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: stensiillastat
    stensiila+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: stensiillainan
    stensiila+N+Pl+Acc: stensiillaid
    stensiila+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: stensiillaidasat
    stensiila+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: stensiillaideameguin


  Noun - bánno: # GOAHTI
    bánno+N+G3+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: bánno-
    bánno+N+G3+Sg+Nom: bánno
    bánno+N+G3+Sg+Gen: bánno
    bánno+N+G3+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: bánnome
    bánno+N+G3+Sg+Acc: bánno
    bánno+N+G3+Sg+Ill: bánnui
    bánno+N+G3+Sg+Loc: bánnos
    bánno+N+G3+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: bánnostan
    bánno+N+G3+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: bánnostat
    bánno+N+G3+Sg+Com+PxSg1: bánnuinan
    bánno+N+G3+Ess: bánnon
    bánno+N+G3+Pl+Nom: bánnot
    bánno+N+G3+Pl+Gen: bánnuid
    bánno+N+G3+Pl+Acc: bánnuid
    bánno+N+G3+Pl+Ill: bánnuide
    bánno+N+G3+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: bánnuidasat
    bánno+N+G3+Pl+Loc: bánnuin
    bánno+N+G3+Pl+Com: bánnuiguin
    bánno+N+G3+Pl+Com+PxDu1: bánnuideameguin
    bánno+N+G3+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bánnoš
    bánno+N+G3+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: bánnožis
    bánno+N+G3+Der/lasj+A+Ess: bánnolažžan
    bánno+N+G3+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: bánnoheapme


  Noun - johtu: # GOAHTILONG
    johtu+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: johtu-
    johtu+N+Sg+Nom: johtu
    johtu+N+Sg+Gen: jođu
    johtu+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: johtome
    johtu+N+Sg+Acc: jođu
    johtu+N+Sg+Ill: johtui
    johtu+N+Sg+Loc: jođus
    johtu+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: jođustan
    johtu+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: jođustat
    johtu+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: jođuinan
    johtu+N+Ess: johtun
    johtu+N+Pl+Nom: jođut
    johtu+N+Pl+Gen: jođuid
    johtu+N+Pl+Acc: jođuid
    johtu+N+Pl+Ill: jođuide
    johtu+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: jođuidasat
    johtu+N+Pl+Loc: jođuin
    johtu+N+Pl+Com: jođuiguin
    johtu+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: jođuideameguin
    johtu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: jođoš
    johtu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: jođožis
    johtu+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: jođolažžan
    johtu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [jođuheapme, jođoheapme]


  Noun - linjá: # GOAHTILONGSHORT
    linjá+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: [linjá-, linja-]
    linjá+N+Sg+Nom: linjá
    linjá+N+Sg+Gen: linjjá
    linjá+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: linjáme
    linjá+N+Sg+Acc: linjjá
    linjá+N+Sg+Ill: linjái
    linjá+N+Sg+Loc: linjjás
    linjá+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: linjjástan
    linjá+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: linjjástat
    linjá+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: linjjáinan
    linjá+N+Ess: linján
    linjá+N+Pl+Nom: linjját
    linjá+N+Pl+Gen: linjjáid
    linjá+N+Pl+Acc: linjjáid
    linjá+N+Pl+Ill: linjjáide
    linjá+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: linjjáidasat
    linjá+N+Pl+Loc: linjjáin
    linjá+N+Pl+Com: linjjáiguin
    linjá+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: linjjáideameguin
    linjá+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: linjjáš
    linjá+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: linjjážis
    linjá+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: linjjálažžan
    linjá+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: linjjáheapme

  Noun - diehtu: # ALBMI
    diehtu+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: [diehto-]
    diehtu+N+Sg+Nom: diehtu
    diehtu+N+Sg+Gen: dieđu
    diehtu+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: dihtome
    diehtu+N+Sg+Acc: dieđu
    diehtu+N+Sg+Ill: dihtui
    diehtu+N+Sg+Loc: dieđus
    diehtu+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: dieđustan
    diehtu+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: dieđustat
    diehtu+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: dieđuinan
    diehtu+N+Pl+Acc: dieđuid
    diehtu+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: dieđuidasat
    diehtu+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: dieđuideameguin
    diehtu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: diđoš
    diehtu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: diđožis
    diehtu+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: diđolažžan
    diehtu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: dieđuheapme


  Noun - skierbmá: # ALBMILONG
    skierbmá+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: skierbmá-
    skierbmá+N+Sg+Nom: skierbmá
    skierbmá+N+Sg+Gen: skierpmá
#   skierbmá+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: skierbmáme
    skierbmá+N+Sg+Acc: skierpmá
    skierbmá+N+Sg+Ill: skierbmái
    skierbmá+N+Sg+Loc: skierpmás
#   skierbmá+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: skierpmástan
#   skierbmá+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: skierpmástat
#   skierbmá+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: skierpmáinan
    skierbmá+N+Pl+Acc: skierpmáid
#   skierbmá+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: skierpmáidasat
#   skierbmá+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: skierpmáideameguin
    skierbmá+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: skierpmáš
    skierbmá+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: skierpmážis
    skierbmá+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: skierpmálažžan
    skierbmá+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: skierpmáheapme


  Noun - liššá: # ALBMILONGSHORT
    liššá+N+G3+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: [liššá-, lišša-]
    liššá+N+G3+Sg+Nom: liššá
    liššá+N+G3+Sg+Gen: liššá
    liššá+N+G3+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: liššáme
    liššá+N+G3+Sg+Acc: liššá
    liššá+N+G3+Sg+Ill: liššái
    liššá+N+G3+Sg+Loc: liššás
    liššá+N+G3+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: liššástan
    liššá+N+G3+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: liššástat
    liššá+N+G3+Sg+Com+PxSg1: liššáinan
    liššá+N+G3+Pl+Acc: liššáid
    liššá+N+G3+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: liššáidasat
    liššá+N+G3+Pl+Com+PxDu1: liššáideameguin
    liššá+N+G3+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: liššáš
    liššá+N+G3+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: liššážis
    liššá+N+G3+Der/lasj+A+Ess: liššálažžan
    liššá+N+G3+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: liššáheapme

  Noun - bárdnebealle: # BEALLE
    bárdnebealle+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: bárdnebealle-
    bárdnebealle+N+Sg+Nom: bárdnebealle
    bárdnebealle+N+Sg+Gen: bárdnebeale
    bárdnebealle+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: bárdnebealláme
    bárdnebealle+N+Sg+Acc: bárdnebeale
    bárdnebealle+N+Sg+Ill: bárdnebeallái
    bárdnebealle+N+Sg+Loc: bárdnebeales
    bárdnebealle+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: bárdnebealestan
    bárdnebealle+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: bárdnebealestat
    bárdnebealle+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: bárdnebeliinan
    bárdnebealle+N+Pl+Acc: bárdnebeliid
    bárdnebealle+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: bárdnebeliidasat
    bárdnebealle+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: bárdnebeliideameguin
    bárdnebealle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bárdnebealáš
    bárdnebealle+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: bárdnebealážis
    bárdnebealle+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: bárdnebealálažžan
    bárdnebealle+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: bárdnebealeheapme


  Noun - čoalli: # AIGI
    čoalli+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: [čoalle-]
    čoalli+N+Sg+Nom: čoalli
    čoalli+N+Sg+Gen: [čoali, čoale]
    čoalli+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: čoalláme
    čoalli+N+Sg+Acc: čoali
    čoalli+N+Sg+Ill: čoallái
    čoalli+N+Sg+Loc: čoalis
    čoalli+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: čoalistan
    čoalli+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: čoalistat
    čoalli+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: čoliinan
    čoalli+N+Pl+Acc: čoliid
    čoalli+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: čoliidasat
    čoalli+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: čoliideameguin
    čoalli+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: čoaláš
    čoalli+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: čoalážis
    čoalli+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: čoalálažžan
    čoalli+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: čoaleheapme

  Noun - muitobassi: # BASSI
    muitobassi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: muitobassi-
    muitobassi+N+Sg+Nom: muitobassi
    muitobassi+N+Sg+Gen: [muitobasi, muitobase]
    muitobassi+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: muitobassáme
    muitobassi+N+Sg+Acc: muitobasi
    muitobassi+N+Sg+Ill: muitobassái
    muitobassi+N+Sg+Loc: muitobasis
    muitobassi+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: muitobasistan
    muitobassi+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: muitobasistat
    muitobassi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: muitobasiinan
    muitobassi+N+Pl+Acc: muitobasiid
    muitobassi+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: muitobasiidasat
    muitobassi+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: muitobasiideameguin
    muitobassi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: muitobasáš
    muitobassi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: muitobasážis
    muitobassi+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: muitobasálažžan
    muitobassi+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: muitobasiheapme
    
  Noun - risteadni: # EADNI
    risteadni+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/SplitR+Cmp: [risteadne-]
    risteadni+N+Sg+Nom: risteadni
    risteadni+N+Sg+Gen: [risteatni, risteatne]
    risteadni+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: risteadnáme
    risteadni+N+Sg+Acc: risteatni
    risteadni+N+Sg+Ill: risteadnái
    risteadni+N+Sg+Loc: risteatnis
    risteadni+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: risteatnistan
    risteadni+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: risteatnistat
    risteadni+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: ristetniinan
    risteadni+N+Pl+Acc: ristetniid
    risteadni+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: ristetniidasat
    risteadni+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: ristetniideameguin
    risteadni+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: risteatnáš
    risteadni+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: risteatnážis
    risteadni+N+Der/lasj+A+Ess: risteatnálažžan
    risteadni+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: risteatneheapme
